Washington statutes.
RCW 26.33.340

Department, agency, and court files confidential—Limited disclosure of information.

Department, agency, and court files regarding an adoption shall be confidential except that reasonably available nonidentifying information may be disclosed upon the written request for the information from the adoptive parent, the adoptee, or the birth parent. If the adoption facilitator refuses to disclose nonidentifying information, the individual may petition the superior court. Identifying information may also be disclosed through the procedure described in RCW 26.33.343.

[ 1993 c 81 s 2; 1990 c 145 s 4; 1984 c 155 s 34.]